New Jersey, session 222, S1883.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 7 of P.L.1993, c.340 (C.45:8B-40) is amended to read as follows: 7.  Each person applying for licensure as a licensed professional counselor shall make application therefor to the board on the form and in the manner the committee prescribes and the board shall immediately refer each application to the committee for appropriate action.  Each applicant shall furnish evidence satisfactory to the committee that [he] the applicant: a.  Is at least 18 years of age; b.  Is of good moral character; c.  Has completed a minimum of 60 graduate semester hours in a planned educational program, which includes a master's degree or doctorate in counseling from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, of which 45 graduate semester hours are distributed in at least eight of the following areas: (1)  Counseling theory and practice; (2)  The helping relationship; (3)  Human growth and development and maladaptive behavior; (4)  Lifestyle and career development; (5)  Group dynamics, processes, counseling, and consulting; (6)  Appraisal of individuals; (7)  Social and cultural foundations; (8)  Research and evaluation; (9)  The counseling profession; d.  Has had at least [three] two years or 3000 hours of supervised full-time counseling experience in a professional counseling setting acceptable to the committee, one year or 1500 hours of which may be obtained prior to the granting of the master's degree.  The committee shall establish criteria for determining the qualifications and status which may constitute supervised counseling experience.  An applicant may eliminate one year or 1500 hours of the required supervised counseling experience by substituting 30 graduate semester hours beyond the master's degree if those graduate semester hours are clearly related to counseling and are acceptable to the committee.  In no case, however, may the applicant have less than one year or 1500 hours of supervised professional counseling experience after the granting of the master's degree; and e.  Has passed the National Counselor Examination of the National Board for Certified Counselors. (cf:  P.L.1993, c.340, s.7) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.